District of Columbia statutes.
47-2753

Enforcement.

Any feepayer who fails to file a return for or pay the fee due as required by § 47-2752 shall be subject to the same enforcement provisions and administrative provisions applicable to the fee as provided under Chapter 18 and Chapter 41 of this title, but the period of limitations upon assessment and collection shall be determined by § 47-4301.

June 14, 1994, D.C. Law 10-128, § 303, 41 DCR 2096
Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-189, § 2(c), 41 DCR 5357
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 59(i), 45 DCR 745
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(uu), 48 DCR 334

History

1981 Ed., § 47-2753.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 13-305 substituted “Chapter 18 and Chapter 41 of this title, but the period of limitations upon assessment and collection shall be determined by § 47-4301” for “Chapter 18 of this title”.

Effect of Amendments

Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”

Editor's Notes